Illinois, session 104th, SB1746.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.26a, 356z.29, 17356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 18356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 19356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 20356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 21356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health 22benefits must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 23356z.19, 370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois   SB1746- 2 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1Insurance Code. The program of health benefits shall provide 2the coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois 3Insurance Code and, for the employees of the State Employee 4Group Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 5Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 6enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 7Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 8other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 9Department of Central Management Services.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 19eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 248-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   SB1746- 3 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)5    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 6including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 7of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 8coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 9benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 10health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 11under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 12356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 13356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 14356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.26a, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 15356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 16356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 17356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 18356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois 19Insurance Code. The coverage shall comply with Sections 20155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance 21Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 22requirements of this Section. The requirement that health 23benefits be covered as provided in this Section is an 24exclusive power and function of the State and is a denial and   SB1746- 4 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the 2Illinois Constitution. A home rule county to which this 3Section applies must comply with every provision of this 4Section. 5    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 6any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 7with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 8Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 9Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 10whatever reason, is unauthorized. 11(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 12102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 131-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 14eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 15102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 161-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 17eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 18103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 197-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 20eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 21revised 11-26-24.) 22    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 23changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 24    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)  SB1746- 5 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 2municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 3self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 4coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 5coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 6covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 7Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 8356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 9356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 10356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 11356z.26a, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 12356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 13356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 14356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 15356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 16coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 17and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 18Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. The 19requirement that health benefits be covered as provided in 20this is an exclusive power and function of the State and is a 21denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection 22(h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home rule municipality to 23which this Section applies must comply with every provision of 24this Section. 25    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 26any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance   SB1746- 6 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 2Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 3Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 4whatever reason, is unauthorized. 5(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 6102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 71-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 8eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 101-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 11eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 137-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 15revised 11-26-24.) 16    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1710-22.3f as follows: 18    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)19    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 20protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 21post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 22policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 23the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 24356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a,   SB1746- 7 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 2356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.26a, 356z.29, 3356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 4356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 5356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 6and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois 7Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 8356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 9comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois 10Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 11requirements of this Section. 12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 19102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 201-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 21eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 22102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 231-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 24eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 25103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 267-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918,   SB1746- 8 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 3adding Section 356z.26a as follows: 4    (215 ILCS 5/356z.26a new)5    Sec. 356z.26a. Clinician-administered drugs.6    (a) As used in this Section:7    "Clinician-administered drug" means an outpatient 8prescription drug other than a vaccine that:9        (1) cannot reasonably be self-administered by the 10    patient to whom the drug is prescribed or by an individual 11    assisting the patient with the self-administration; and12        (2) is typically administered:13            (A) by a health care provider authorized under the 14        laws of this State to administer the drug, including a 15        health care provider acting under a physician's 16        delegation and supervision; and17            (B) in a physician's office, hospital outpatient 18        infusion center, or other clinical setting.19    "Health benefit plan" means an individual or group policy 20of accident or health insurance, health care plan, or other 21hospital or medical policy, certificate, or contract.22    "Health care plan" has the meaning given to that term in 23Section 1-2 of the Health Maintenance Organization Act. 24"Health care plan" does not include a managed care   SB1746- 9 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1organization that provides, arranges, or reimburses for the 2delivery of health care services to individuals who are 3enrolled in the program of medical assistance under the 4Illinois Public Aid Code or under the Children's Health 5Insurance Program Act.6    "Pharmacy" has the meaning given to that term in Section 3 7of the Pharmacy Practice Act.8    "Provider" has the meaning given to that term in Section 9370g.10    "Site of service" means the physical location where a 11clinician-administered drug is administered, including, but 12not limited to, an outpatient hospital, physician's office, 13ambulatory infusion site, home-based site, or other clinical 14setting.15    (b) To ensure access to safe and effective drug therapies, 16a health benefit plan amended, delivered, issued, or renewed 17on or after January 1, 2026 that provides prescription drug 18coverage through a medical or pharmacy health benefit or its 19contracted pharmacy benefit manager shall not:20        (1) require an enrollee to obtain a covered 21    clinician-administered drug from a pharmacy selected by 22    the health benefit plan or pharmacy benefit manager with 23    the intent to transport the drug to another site of 24    service for administration;25        (2) require an enrollee to obtain a covered 26    clinician-administered drug from a pharmacy selected by   SB1746- 10 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1    the health benefit plan or pharmacy benefit manager;2        (3) notwithstanding any other provision of law, steer 3    or offer financial or other incentives to induce an 4    enrollee to obtain a clinician-administered drug from a 5    pharmacy identified by the health benefit plan or pharmacy 6    benefit manager;7        (4) condition, deny, restrict, refuse to authorize, or 8    otherwise limit benefits and coverage to an enrollee for 9    medically necessary clinician-administered drugs and 10    related services obtained from the provider that 11    administers the drug or from a pharmacy that is not 12    selected by the health benefit plan or pharmacy benefit 13    manager;14        (5) condition, deny, restrict, refuse to authorize, or 15    otherwise limit reimbursement to a provider for covered 16    medically necessary clinician-administered drugs and 17    related services obtained from the provider that 18    administers the drug or from a pharmacy that is not 19    selected by the health benefit plan or pharmacy benefit 20    manager;21        (6) assess higher deductibles, copayments, 22    coinsurance, or other cost-sharing amounts for 23    clinician-administered drugs obtained from the provider 24    that administers the drug or from a pharmacy that is not 25    selected by the health benefit plan or pharmacy benefit 26    manager;  SB1746- 11 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1        (7) require an enrollee to use a home infusion 2    pharmacy to receive clinician-administered drugs in the 3    enrollee's home or to use a site of service identified by 4    the health benefit plan or pharmacy benefit manager;5        (8) include the site of service in prior approval or 6    medical necessity criteria for clinician-administered 7    drugs;8        (9) require an enrollee to use the pharmacy benefit 9    for specific clinician-administered drugs; or10        (10) prohibit a provider from billing the health 11    benefit plan for reimbursement of clinician-administered 12    drugs.13    (c) A clinician-administered drug shall meet the supply 14chain security controls and chain of distribution set by the 15federal Drug Supply Chain Security Act.16    (d) The Department may adopt rules as necessary to 17implement the provisions of this Section. 18    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 19amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 20    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)21    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)22    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 23    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 24the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140,   SB1746- 12 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 2152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 3155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 4356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 5356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 6356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 7356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 8356z.26, 356z.26a, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 9356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 10356z.39, 356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 11356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 12356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 13356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 14356z.68, 356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 15356z.75, 356z.77, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 16368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 17403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 18of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 19XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 20Illinois Insurance Code.21    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 22for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 23Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 24are deemed to be "domestic companies":25        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 26    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;  SB1746- 13 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 2    State; or3        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 4    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 5    of this State, except a corporation subject to 6    substantially the same requirements in its state of 7    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 8    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.9    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 10acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 11pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,12        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 13    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 14    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 15    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 16    acquisition of control takes effect;17        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 18    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 19    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 20    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 21    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 22    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 23    other acquisition of control;24        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 25    following information:26            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the   SB1746- 14 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 2        Organization sought to be acquired;3            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 4        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 5        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 6        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 7        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 8        forma financial statements reflecting projected 9        combined operation for a period of 2 years;10            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 11        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 12        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 13        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and14            (D) such other information as the Director shall 15        require.16    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 17Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 18any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 19enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 20maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 21to its health care certificates).22    (e) In considering any management contract or service 23agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 24Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 25specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 26take into account the effect of the management contract or   SB1746- 15 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 2and the financial condition of the health maintenance 3organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 4into account the effect of the management contract or service 5agreement on competition.6    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 7Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 8Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 9defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 10Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 11group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 12additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:13        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 14    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 15    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 16    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 17    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 18    not be less than one year); and19        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 20    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 21    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 22    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 23    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 24    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 25    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 26    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and   SB1746- 16 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 2    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 3    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 4    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 5    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 6    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 7    plan years.8    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 9statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 10describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 11and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 12the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 13to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 14profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 15unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 16or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 17experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 18the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 19enrollment unit.20    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 21Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 22contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 23refund authorized under this Section.24    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 25if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 26accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative   SB1746- 17 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 2Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 3adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 4(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 5102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 61-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 7eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 8102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 91-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 10eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 126-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 13eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 14103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 151-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 16eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 17103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 181-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 19    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)20    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 21    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 22the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 23141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 24152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 25155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g,   SB1746- 18 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 2356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 3356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 4356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 5356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.26a, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 6356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 7356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 8356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 9356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 10356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 11356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 12356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 13367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 14402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, 15paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles 16IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and 17XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code.18    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 19for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 20Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 21are deemed to be "domestic companies":22        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 23    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;24        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 25    State; or26        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another   SB1746- 19 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 2    of this State, except a corporation subject to 3    substantially the same requirements in its state of 4    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 5    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.6    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 7acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 8pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,9        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 10    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 11    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 12    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 13    acquisition of control takes effect;14        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 15    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 16    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 17    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 18    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 19    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 20    other acquisition of control;21        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 22    following information:23            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 24        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 25        Organization sought to be acquired;26            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the   SB1746- 20 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 2        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 3        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 4        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 5        forma financial statements reflecting projected 6        combined operation for a period of 2 years;7            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 8        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 9        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 10        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and11            (D) such other information as the Director shall 12        require.13    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 14Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 15any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 16enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 17maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 18to its health care certificates).19    (e) In considering any management contract or service 20agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 21Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 22specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 23take into account the effect of the management contract or 24service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 25and the financial condition of the health maintenance 26organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take   SB1746- 21 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1into account the effect of the management contract or service 2agreement on competition.3    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 4Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 5Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 6defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 7Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 8group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 9additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:10        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 11    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 12    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 13    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 14    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 15    not be less than one year); and16        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 17    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 18    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 19    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 20    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 21    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 22    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 23    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 24    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 25    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 26    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and   SB1746- 22 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 2    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 3    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 4    plan years.5    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 6statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 7describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 8and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 9the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 10to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 11profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 12unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 13or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 14experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 15the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 16enrollment unit.17    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 18Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 19contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 20refund authorized under this Section.21    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 22if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 23accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 24Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 25Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 26adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized.   SB1746- 23 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 2102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 31-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 4eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 5102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 61-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 7eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 8103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 96-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 10eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 11103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 121-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 13eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 14103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 151-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 1611-26-24.) 17    Section 35. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 18amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 19    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)20    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 21services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 22or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 23Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 24143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3,   SB1746- 24 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b1355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 2356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 3356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 4356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18, 5356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.26a, 6356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 7356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 8356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 9356z.68, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 364.01, 10364.3, 367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 11and 412, and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the 12Illinois Insurance Code.13    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 14any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 15with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 16Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 17Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 18whatever reason, is unauthorized. 19(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 20102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 2110-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 22eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 23102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 241-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 25eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 26103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff.   SB1746- 25 -LRB104 10199 BAB 20272 b11-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 2eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 3103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 41-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 5    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 6changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 7that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 8represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 9not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 10made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 11Public Act.